Louisiana, session 2026, HB316.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:24.10(K) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
17:7.2(A)(11) through (13), 24.14, 100.13(N) and (O), and 3996(B)(24) are hereby enacted
to read as follows:
§7.2. Approved teacher education programs
A. In carrying out its responsibility to prescribe the qualifications and
provide for the certification of teachers under authority of R.S. 17:7(6), the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, subject to the constitutional power
and authority of the Board of Regents, the Board of Supervisors for the University
of Louisiana System, the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State University and
Agricultural and Mechanical College, and the Board of Supervisors of Southern
University and Agricultural and Mechanical College, shall establish qualifications
and requirements for the approval of teacher education programs from which
Page 1 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 316 ENROLLED
graduates may be certified. The qualifications and requirements established by the
State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education for an approved teacher
education program shall include but not be limited to the following:
* * *
(11) That a program for candidates seeking certification to teach students in
kindergarten through third grade include instruction on foundational literacy skills
that includes the following:
(a) How to effectively teach the foundational literacy skills of phonemic
awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension.
(b) How to differentiate instruction for teaching students with advanced
literacy skills and students with significant literacy deficiencies, including dyslexia.
(c) How to implement effective literacy instruction using high quality
instructional materials that do not include the three-cueing systems model.
(d) How to administer literacy screeners to students, interpret results using
state-established benchmarks, and apply data to instructional planning and
intervention decisions.
(e) How to understand the negative impacts of the three-cueing systems
model, how to identify it in curricula, and the reasons why it is a flawed model of
teaching children to read.
(12)(a) That a program for special education and secondary education
teacher candidates include instruction on adolescent literacy skills that includes the
following:
(i) Effective strategies for teaching reading aligned to instruction based on
the science of reading, including explicit and systematic instruction in phonological
awareness, the alphabetic principle, oral language development, comprehension,
content literacy instruction, disciplinary literacy instruction, writing, and advanced
phonics including encoding, fluency, and morphology including etymology.
(ii) Implementation of reading instruction using high quality instructional
materials as identified by the state Department of Education.
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 316 ENROLLED
(iii) Provision of effective instruction on interventions for all students,
including students with dyslexia.
(iv) Understanding and use of student data to make instructional decisions.
(v) Incorporation of content literacy across disciplinary areas.
(b) For the purposes of this Paragraph, "adolescent literacy", "content
literacy", and "disciplinary literacy" shall be defined as in R.S. 17:24.14.
(13) That the requirements in Paragraphs (11) and (12) of this Subsection be
aligned to ensure continuity and progression of instruction across certification areas
and grade spans.
* * *
§24.10. Early literacy instruction and screening; foundational numeracy skills
instruction and screening; parental notification; reporting
* * *
K.(1) Each public school governing authority shall ensure that any individual
student plan as provided for in this Section or a consolidated student plan as provided
for in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection that was developed in a prior school year is
annually reviewed during the first eight weeks of school. For each plan, the review
shall include:
(a) Evaluation of the effectiveness of prior-year interventions, additional
support, and services offered to the student in the previous year.
(b) Identification of updates needed to the support offered through the plan.
(c) Input from any members of the team that initially developed the plan,
including but not limited to the teacher, reading specialist or interventionist,
principal, other pertinent school personnel, and the parent or guardian.
(2) The following plans may be consolidated into a single plan for each
student, as applicable:
(1) (a) Individual reading improvement plans as provided for in Subsection
F of this Section.
(2) (b) Individual numeracy improvement plans as provided for in
Subsection J of this Section.
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 316 ENROLLED
(3) (c) Individual reading plans as provided for in R.S. 17:24.11.
(4) (d) Plans for accelerated instruction as provided for in R.S. 17:100.13(H).
(3) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to supersede, conflict with, or
override the requirements of an individualized education program or an
individualized accommodation plan, including the provision of any related services
or accommodations required by federal law. The provisions of any such program or
plan shall supersede and control to the extent of a conflict with any provision of this
Section.
* * *
§24.14. Adolescent literacy instruction and assessment; parental notification;
professional development
A. For purposes of this Section:
(1) "Adolescent literacy" means the development and application of reading,
writing, language, and comprehension skills necessary for students in grades four
through eight to access, understand, analyze, and produce grade-level text across all
subject areas.
(2) "Adolescent literacy intervention course" means a professional learning
course that includes all of the components of an adolescent literacy professional
development course as defined in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection and all of the
following:
(a) Comprehensive training on the science of reading, including explicit and
systematic instruction in phonological and phonemic awareness, phonics, including
decoding and encoding, fluency, vocabulary, syntax, and comprehension.
(b) Approaches to assist educators in determining which students may be at
risk for development of reading and writing difficulties, including dyslexia,
dysgraphia, and other learning differences.
(c) Training in the identification of and the use of appropriate interventions,
accommodations, and teaching techniques for students with reading and writing
difficulties, including dyslexia, dysgraphia, and other learning differences.
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 316 ENROLLED
(d) Training in the identification of reading deficiencies based on reading
assessment data.
(3) "Adolescent literacy professional development course" means a
professional learning course that is based on the science of reading designed for the
professional development of educators and includes all of the following:
(a) Strategies to increase educator knowledge of how to teach reading and
writing skills for students.
(b) Identification of literacy skills essential to specific content areas.
(c) Explicit and systematic instruction in advanced phonics, vocabulary,
morphology, comprehension, content literacy, disciplinary literacy, knowledge
building, and writing.
(d) Scientifically based reading research strategies for how to identify and
address reading deficiencies in adolescent learners.
(4) "Content literacy" means a literacy instructional approach where students
use general reading and writing strategies to learn information across subject and
content areas.
(5) "Disciplinary literacy" means a literacy instructional approach that
teaches students how to use literacy to think, interpret text, and engage in advanced
participation and conversations like a disciplinary expert would.
(6) "Student" means a student in grades four through eight.
(7) "Teacher" means each fourth through eighth grade teacher who teaches
reading or English language arts.
B. The state Department of Education, referred to in this Section as the
"department", shall:
(1) Develop an adolescent literacy program for students, including special
education students.
(2)(a) Develop an approved list of one or more reliable and valid reading
assessments for students. In developing this list, the department shall consider:
(i) The time required to conduct the assessment, with the intention of
minimizing the impact on instructional time.
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 316 ENROLLED
(ii) The timeline of statewide assessments during the spring semester.
(iii) The availability of appropriate accommodations for students with
specialized plans.
(iv) The timeliness in reporting assessment results to teachers,
administrators, and parents.
(v) How assessment results can be used to inform instruction and
intervention, including diagnosis of and progress monitoring for students who may
qualify for high-dosage tutoring pursuant to R.S. 17:100.13.
(vi) The availability of comprehensive training on any department-approved
assessment system to ensure teachers have the knowledge and skills to administer
the assessment and can use the data to inform instruction and interventions based on
student needs.
(b) Any approved reading assessment shall include:
(i) A universal screener that identifies students at risk of reading failure with
progress monitoring capabilities.
(ii) A diagnostic tool which identifies specific skill deficits in early
foundational skills as well as deficits in advanced phonics, vocabulary, and
sentence-level comprehension.
(iii) A benchmark indicator for use throughout the school year to assess
progress and proficiency level overall and on discrete skills.
(3)(a) Develop or identify and approve adolescent literacy professional
development courses and adolescent literacy intervention courses.
(b) Make available resources for job-embedded coaching support for
administrators and teachers, including:
(i) Training on evidence-based reading instructional strategies and
data-based decision making.
(ii) Content literacy and disciplinary literacy instructional support to
reinforce student use of general reading and writing strategies as students learn
information across subjects and content areas.
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 316 ENROLLED
(iii) Demonstration of lessons, co-teaching, modeling, and teacher
observation.
(iv) Feedback for improvement.
C. Each public school shall:
(1) Provide each student with core instruction that includes advanced
phonics, morphology, etymology, fluency, vocabulary, comprehension, and writing
according to grade-level standards for English language arts. Daily class schedules
shall be adaptable and allocate sufficient instructional time for core instruction,
intervention, and academic enrichment as deemed appropriate by analysis of student
data.
(2) Within the first thirty days of each school year, administer an approved
reading assessment as provided in Paragraph (B)(2) of this Section to any student
who scored below mastery in English language arts on the state assessment
administered the prior school year.
(3) Within fifteen days of identifying that a student has demonstrated reading
deficiencies based on the results of the reading assessment, notify the student's parent
or legal guardian in writing that the student has been identified as having such
deficiencies. Such notification shall include:
(a) Notification that an individual reading improvement plan is being
developed as provided in Paragraph (5) of this Subsection.
(b) A description of the current services that are provided to the student and
suggested resources or strategies that the parent can use to support reading at home.
(c) Notification that the parent shall be informed in writing of the student's
progress toward becoming a skilled reader throughout the school year with each
progress report.
(4) Provide each student identified as having such deficiencies with intensive
interventions to address the specific deficiencies. The student shall be provided with
all of the following:
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 316 ENROLLED
(a) Regular access to instruction from an individual who has completed an
approved adolescent literacy intervention course as provided in Paragraph (B)(3) of
this Section and is a reading teacher, reading specialist, or reading interventionist.
(b) Reading interventions and support using high quality instructional
materials in accordance with Paragraph (6) of this Subsection.
(c) Time in the student schedule, in addition to core instruction, for intensive
interventions.
(d) Targeted small group reading intervention based on student needs and
specified in an individual reading improvement plan.
(e) Summer school remediation programs or other forms of remediation as
appropriate to meet the academic needs of the student based on the results of the
universal screener, diagnostic tool, or the English language arts state assessment.
(5) Provide each student, within thirty days of being identified as having
such deficiencies, with an individual reading improvement plan. The plan shall be
created by the teacher, reading specialist or interventionist, principal or designee, and
other pertinent school personnel in collaboration with the parents or guardians, who
shall be provided a written copy of the plan. The plan shall offer intensive reading
instructional intervention time for the student, while continuing grade-level
instruction, and shall remain in place until the student no longer demonstrates a
deficiency in reading in accordance with the approved reading assessment or the
state assessment in English language arts. The plan shall be documented using the
template provided by the department and shall include the following:
(a) The specific deficiencies in reading as determined by the state assessment
and the reading assessment system.
(b) The goals and benchmarks for student growth in reading.
(c) A description of the specific measures that shall be used to evaluate and
monitor the student's reading progress.
(d) A description of the proposed interventions and supplemental
instructional services aligned with scientifically based reading research that are
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 316 ENROLLED
designed to remedy each identified reading deficiency and that shall be provided to
the student.
(e) Strategies, resources, and materials that shall be provided to the parent
or guardian to support student reading progress at home.
(f) For students who receive special education services, the alignment with
the student's Individualized Education Plan.
(g) Any additional services the teacher deems available and appropriate to
accelerate the student's reading development.
(6) Ensure, pursuant to R.S. 17:351.1, that all textbooks and instructional
materials used to teach and provide intervention services for students are
high-quality, fully aligned to state content standards, content-rich, aligned with
scientifically based reading research, and focus on advanced phonics, vocabulary,
comprehension, and content writing embedded throughout all core subject areas.
Curricula, supplemental materials, and interventions used to teach reading shall
focus on decoding, fluency, and language structure as well as vocabulary,
comprehension, and content writing instruction and shall not include the use of the
three-cueing systems model.
(7)(a) Beginning September 1, 2026, and triennially thereafter, develop and
submit to the department an adolescent literacy skills plan for students and post the
plan on its website. Each plan shall include:
(i) The amount of time to be spent daily on literacy skills instruction and a
description of how the instructional time shall be used.
(ii) A list of English language arts textbooks and instructional materials used
by the school.
(iii) A description of the interventions and support available to students
identified as having literacy skills below grade level.
(iv) A description of any professional development in literacy instruction
provided to teachers.
Page 9 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 316 ENROLLED
(b) This plan may be consolidated with the foundational literacy skills plan
provided for in R.S. 17:24.10(C) into a single school plan that meets the
requirements of this Paragraph and that Subsection.
(c)(i) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 17:3996(B)(24), a charter
school with a school performance letter grade or progress index of "A", "B", or "C"
is exempt from the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
(ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
a charter school with a school performance letter grade or progress index of "D" or
"F" shall submit the adolescent literacy skills plan required by that Subparagraph to
its chartering authority instead of the department.
D.(1) Each public school governing authority shall ensure that any individual
reading improvement plan as provided for in Paragraph (C)(5) of this Section or a
consolidated student plan as provided for in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection that was
developed in a prior school year is annually reviewed during the first eight weeks of
school. For each plan, the review shall include:
(a) Evaluation of the effectiveness of prior-year interventions, additional
support, and services offered to the student in the previous year.
(b) Identification of updates needed to the support offered through the plan.
(c) Input from any members of the team that initially developed the plan,
including but not limited to the teacher, reading specialist or interventionist,
principal, other pertinent school personnel, and the parent or guardian.
(2) The following plans may be consolidated into a single plan for each
student, as applicable:
(a) Individual reading improvement plan as provided for in Paragraph (C)(5)
of this Section.
(b) Plan for accelerated instruction as provided for in R.S. 17:100.13(H).
E. Any adolescent literacy intervention course or adolescent literacy
professional development course shall be completed during existing weekly,
job-embedded teacher collaboration time. Nothing in this Section shall be construed
to require or authorize an increase in such time or to extend the teacher's work day
Page 10 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 316 ENROLLED
or work year. If completion of any such course occurs during a teacher's planning
time as provided in R.S. 17:434 or outside of any employee's regular work hours, the
employee shall be compensated as provided in R.S. 17:418(A)(3)(a). Any
requirement for such a course shall be implemented in a manner consistent with R.S.
17:419.4(A).
F. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall adopt rules
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions
of this Section.
* * *
§100.13. Expanded academic support
* * *
N. A school board may provide ongoing coaching support in evidence-based
instruction to tutors delivering high-dosage tutoring.
O. For teachers who serve as tutors as provided in this Section, any
professional learning course, intervention course, or coaching support shall be
completed during weekly, job-embedded teacher collaboration time and shall not
require an increase in such time. If such activities occur during a teacher's planning
time as provided R.S. 17:434 or outside of any employee's regular work hours, the
employee shall be compensated as provided in R.S. 17:418(A)(3)(a). Any
requirement for a professional learning course, intervention course, or coaching
support shall be implemented in a manner consistent with R.S. 17:419.4(A).
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
Page 11 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 316 ENROLLED
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(24) Adolescent literacy, R.S. 17:24.14.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 17:24.9(C) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3.(A) The provisions of R.S. 17:24.14 as enacted by Section 1 of this Act
shall be implemented beginning with the 2027-2028 school year except for the September 1,
2026, plan submission deadline provided for in R.S. 17:24.14(C)(7).
(B) The provisions of R.S. 17:7.2(A)(12) and (13) as enacted by Section 1 of this
Act shall be applicable to persons entering teacher education programs during or after the
2027-2028 academic year.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 12 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.